New Jersey, session 222, S1602.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A disabled veteran resident taxpayer whose homestead is a unit of residential rental property shall be allowed a credit against the tax otherwise due for the taxable year under the New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act, N.J.S.A.54A:1-1 et seq., for that portion of the rent constituting property taxes, due and paid for the calendar year in which the rent constituting taxes is due and payable for occupancy of that homestead up to a maximum allowed credit of $1,000 for the taxable year. b.    Spouses who elect to file separate income tax returns pursuant to the New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act, N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., shall each be entitled to one-half of the credit allowed pursuant to this section. c.     If more than one taxpayer, other than the taxpayer and his spouse, occupy the unit of residential rental property for which this credit is to be claimed, a taxpayer qualifying for the credit provided in this section may only claim a credit for rent constituting property taxes in the amount of rent actually paid by the taxpayer. d.    A credit allowed pursuant to this section shall not reduce the tax liability otherwise due pursuant to N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq. for a taxable year to an amount less than zero. e.     A credit allowed pursuant to this section shall be in addition to a credit allowed for rent constituting property taxes pursuant to section 6 of P.L.1996, c.60 (C.54A:3A-20). f.     As used in this section: Disabled veteran means an individual who would qualify as a disabled veteran pursuant to the definition set forth in   N.J.S.11A:5-1. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and apply to taxable years beginning after the date of enactment.